Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin WORTHINGTON INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT; SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of the following projects in Independent School District No. 518, Worthington, are exempt from sales and use tax imposed under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, if the materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after April 30, 2020, and before January 1, 2028: new text end new text begin (1) construction of a new grades 3 through 5 intermediate school building; new text end new text begin (2) construction of a new community education building to serve early childhood, adult basic education, and the Nobles County Integration Collaborative programs; new text end new text begin (3) construction of a new storage facility to serve the Worthington Intermediate School, Worthington Learning Center and gymnastics facility, and Worthington Community Education building; new text end new text begin (4) reconstruction and replacement of the parking lot at the Worthington Middle School; new text end new text begin (5) construction of an addition to the Worthington High School and remodeling of existing space and expansion of core areas; new text end new text begin (6) construction of a new ice arena with associated event space; new text end new text begin (7) installation of a turf football field at the Worthington Middle School; new text end new text begin (8) demolition of the former West Elementary building and construction of sports fields with associated parking; new text end new text begin (9) reconstruction of Trojan Field and associated facilities; and new text end new text begin (10) improvements to the Worthington Learning Center and gymnastics facility. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 289A.40, claims for refunds for sales and purchases made after April 30, 2020, and before October 1, 2021, may be filed until January 1, 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after April 30, 2020, and before January 1, 2028. new text end